Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1083.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2.1 of the act of June 19, 1931 (P.L.589, No.202), referred to as the Barbers' License Law, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2.1. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Barber shop." A place, including a mobile unit, where the practice of barbering is performed by a barber licensed under this act.123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *"Mobile unit." A self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed mobile unit that meets all of the following requirements:(1) Is at least twenty-four feet in length.(2) Is licensed by the board as an establishment for the practice of barbering under this act.(3) Complies with all health and safety regulations established by the board.Section 2. Sections 10 and 11 of the act are amended to read:Section 10. The board shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations prescribing the sanitary requirement of each barber shop or barber school, in co-operation with the Department of Health, and shall transmit a copy thereof to the proprietor or person operating such barber shop or school, which shall at all times be kept conspicuously displayed in such shop or school. It shall be unlawful for any person to open either a new barber shop or move his or her shop, except a mobile unit, to another place, or take over as owner an existing barber shop, until he or she has filed an application with the board for the inspection, approval and registration of such shop. It is further provided that no barber shop may open for business until said inspection has been had and the shop approved. The inspector shall, immediately upon his inspection and approval, issue a temporary registration of such shop whereupon it shall be lawful for the shop to be opened for business. The temporary license shall be effective until the issuance of either a permanent license or an official rejection of the application. It shall be unlawful for any person to sleep in, or for any owner or manager to permit any person to sleep in or use for 20250HB1083PN1201 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residential purposes, any room used as a barber shop or a school of barbering. All rooms used for such purposes shall be used for barbering purposes, manicuring, shoe shining and such allied business, as may be approved by the board. No member of the board may inspect or be physically present during the inspection of a barber shop or a school of barbering. Any duly authorized agent of the board may enter and make reasonable examination of any barber shop or barber school during the business hours, for the purpose of ascertaining the sanitary conditions thereof, and ascertaining whether the shop or school, and all persons working therein, are properly licensed and registered. Any barber shop, barber school, or tools, appliances, and furnishings in use therein, kept in an unclean and unsanitary condition as to be a danger to health or to the creation and spreading of infectious and contagious diseases, is hereby declared to be a public nuisance, and the board may suspend or revoke the license of the proprietor thereof or any person operating in such barber shop or school, or the permit hereinafter required for such shop, or school. Any duly authorized agent of the board shall, following an examination and inspection of the premises under this section, affix a seal or sticker, in a conspicuous place, of such design and size as may be prescribed by the board attesting to the fact that the premises have passed such examination and inspection and, further, indicating the date thereof. Each shop shall have displayed in a conspicuous place at the shop entrance a notice to consumers listing the phone number at which a consumer may report a complaint to the State Board of Barber Examiners.Section 11. The department shall keep a record of the names and addresses of the barber shops, or the addresses of the 20250HB1083PN1201 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owners of barber shops that are mobile units, to which, and the names of all persons to whom, licenses are issued under this act. The department shall furnish copies of such records to the public upon request and may establish a reasonable fee for such copies which shall not exceed the cost of reproduction.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1083PN1201 - 4 - 123456